Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.40.200

General law relating to public works and contracts.

Every code city shall have the authority to make public improvements and to perform public works under authority provided by general law for any class of city and to make contracts in accordance with procedure and subject to the conditions provided therefor, including but not limited to the provisions of: (1) Chapter 39.04 RCW, relating to public works; (2) RCW 35.23.352 relating to competitive bidding for public works, materials and supplies; (3) RCW 9.18.120 and 9.18.150 relating to suppression of competitive bidding; (4) chapter 60.28 RCW relating to liens for materials and labor performed; (5) chapter 39.08 RCW relating to contractor's bonds; (6) chapters 39.12 and 43.03 RCW relating to prevailing wages; (7) chapter 49.12 RCW relating to hours of labor; (8) chapter 51.12 RCW relating to workers' compensation; (9) chapter 49.60 RCW relating to antidiscrimination in employment; (10) chapter 39.24 RCW relating to the use of Washington commodities; and (11) chapter 39.28 RCW relating to emergency public works.

[ 1995 c 164 s 2; 1987 c 185 s 4; 1983 c 3 s 65; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.40.200.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—1987 c 185: See notes following RCW 51.12.130.